Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.020

Corporate name.

The name of a county, designated by law, is its corporate name, and it must be known and designated thereby in all actions and proceedings touching its corporate rights, property, and duties.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.01.020. Prior: Code 1881 s 2654; RRS s 3983.]